Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. Hospitals, Hospital Districts and Rural Health Care Districts

§ 18-8-301.
Additional powers; requirements and conditions; approval by governing body.

Subject to the requirements of this section, any county memorial hospital, special hospital district established under W.S.

35-2-401

through

35-2-438

, rural health care district established under W.S.

35-2-701

through

35-2-709

and senior health care district established under W.S.

35-2-1201

through

35-2-1203

may, either within the county of its establishment or without, within this state or without:

Engage in shared services and other cooperative ventures;

Enter into partnerships;

Either alone or in conjunction with any other entity, form or be an interest owner of corporations, partnership, limited partnership, cooperative, registered limited liability partnership, nonprofit association limited liability partnerships, limited liability companies and any other trust or association organized under the laws of this state; and

Have members of its governing body or its officers or administrators serve as directors, officers or employees of any venture, association, partnership, corporation or entity entered into or formed pursuant to this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 22, § 2.

No county memorial hospital, special hospital district or rural health care district shall invest or otherwise use any revenues generated from taxes to engage in any activity authorized under subsection (a) of this section. All monies invested or otherwise used in any activity specified under subsection (a) of this section are subject to the requirements of W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-124

.

The authority granted under subsection (a) of this section shall only be exercised:

For the delivery of health care services, provided that an entity primarily organized and operated to sell services to health care providers may also sell such services for nonhealth care purposes; and

With the approval and consent of:

The board of county commissioners if a county memorial hospital;

The district board of trustees if a special hospital district;

The board of trustees if a rural health care district; and

The board of trustees if a senior health care district.

No county memorial hospital, special hospital district, rural health care district or senior health care district shall exercise any authority granted by subsection (a) of this section in any Wyoming municipality in which a hospital currently exists unless and until that hospital has been given an opportunity to participate with the undertaking hospital, special hospital district, rural health care district or senior health care district. This subsection shall not apply to any entity which is organized for the purpose of selling administrative services to health care providers.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 136, § 1; 2003, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; ch. 206, § 1; 2009, ch. 200, § 1; 2020 ch. 17, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the provision in (c)(i); and added the last sentence in (d).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), substituted a comma for “and” following “35-2-438,” and added “and senior health care district established under W.S.

35-2-1201

through

35-2-1203

” following “35-2-709”; added (c)(ii)(D) and made related changes; in (d), substituted a comma for “or” following “special hospital district” twice, and added “or senior health care district” twice following “rural health care district.”